Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 7

Motor Vehicles—Junkyards, Fees

7-51-701. Automobile graveyards or junkyards — Licensing and control.

For the purposes of this section, “automobile graveyard” means any lot or place that is exposed to the weather and upon which more than five (5) motor vehicles of any kind, incapable of being operated, and that it would not be economically practical to make operative, are placed, located or found. “Automobile graveyard” or “automobile junkyard” shall not be construed to mean an establishment having facilities for processing iron, steel or nonferrous scrap and whose principal produce is scrap iron, steel or nonferrous scrap for sale for remelting purposes only.

The governing body of each county, by resolution, and the governing body of each city, town or metropolitan government, by ordinance, may regulate and license the maintenance of automobile graveyards as defined in subsection (a), and may prescribe fines and other punishment for violations of such resolutions or ordinances.

No such ordinance shall be adopted until after notice of intention to propose the ordinance for adoption shall have been published prior to its adoption once a week for two (2) successive weeks in some newspaper published in such county or municipality or, if there is no newspaper published in the county or municipality, then in some newspaper having general circulation in such county or municipality, and no ordinance shall become effective until it has been published in full for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper.

Acts 1965, ch. 197, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 6-741.

Compiler's Notes. This section (Acts 1965, ch. 197, §§ 1-3) was declared unconstitutional as applied to counties in State v. Toole, 224 Tenn. 491, 457 S.W.2d 269 (1970), in that by giving counties authority to regulate and license automobile graveyards and to prescribe fines and other punishments for violations, the statute violated requirements of Tenn. Const., art. I, § 8, that law of land be general.

Cross-References. Records of dealers of used parts and accessories, §55-14-104.

7-51-702. Nonresident motorists not charged fee or tax for motor vehicle related privileges.

Except as may be provided by general law, it is unlawful for the governing body of any county, municipality or metropolitan government to require any person who is not a resident of such county, or of the county in which such municipality is located, or of the area governed by such metropolitan government, to pay to such county, municipality or metropolitan government any license fee or tax or any regulatory license fee or tax of whatever nature for the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the roads, streets or highways in such county, municipality or metropolitan government or for the maintenance or operation of any traffic control device or the regulation and control of motor vehicle traffic on the roads, streets, or highways in any county, municipality or metropolitan government.

This section shall apply and shall be controlling, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary of any private act or of any resolution or ordinance of any local governing body and regardless of the legal description or designation of any such fee or tax.

This section shall not prohibit the collection of fees authorized for county clerks in connection with the registration and licensing of motor vehicles under title 55.

Acts 1969, ch. 240, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 6-742.

Cross-References. Motor vehicle license tax on nonresidents prohibited, §6-55-502.

Attorney General Opinions. Application of county wheel tax, OAG 99-065, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (3/16/99).

7-51-703. Collection of municipal motor vehicle fees by county clerk — Issuance of wheel tax license or motor vehicle regulatory license.

The county clerk of any county and any municipality located wholly or in part in such county by resolution of its governing body may enter into an agreement with such terms as may be agreed upon, including appropriate compensation, providing for the county clerk to collect for such municipality motor vehicle regulatory fees imposed by such municipality; provided, that such agreement shall be subject to the approval of the county legislative body. Before any collections may be made under such agreement, the municipality shall file with the county clerk a certified copy of its ordinance imposing such regulatory fee.

Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of counties, county clerks, municipalities, utility districts and cooperatives to enter into agreements or contracts under any other statute or charter.

In those counties having a metropolitan form of government, the county clerk shall issue any required wheel tax license or motor vehicle regulatory license at the same time the clerk's office is selling a state license, subject to such terms and conditions as may be established by the metropolitan government's chief financial officer and approved by the county governing body.

The county clerk shall issue any required wheel tax license or motor vehicle regulatory license at the same time the clerk's office is selling a state license, subject to such terms and conditions as may be established by the county or municipal government's chief financial officer and approved by the applicable governing body.

Acts 1976, ch. 693, §§ 2, 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 351, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-743; Acts 1981, ch. 72, § 1; 1981, ch. 518, § 1; 1984, ch. 727, § 1; 1984, ch. 773, § 2.

Cross-References. Motor vehicle license tax on nonresidents prohibited, §6-55-502.

Motor vehicle privilege tax, §5-8-102.

Registration and renewal of registration of motor vehicles by county clerk, title 55, ch. 4, part 1.